Mississippi, session 2026, HB595.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The Legislature finds that a comprehensive evaluation of public and charter school facilities is necessary to ensure the optimal utilization of academic space, assess current facility conditions, and identify opportunities for modernization. Such an evaluation is critical to prioritize expenditures efficiently within budget limitations while considering construction project costs and the life cycle costs of facilities' capital maintenance, repair, and renovation. SECTION 2. (1)  The State Department of Education shall conduct a study and assessment of all public and charter school facilities across the state. (2)  The department is authorized to procure the services of a third-party provider specializing in facilities optimization, infrastructure assessment, and budget prioritization to assist with the study. (3)  The study and assessment shall include, but not be limited to, the following areas: (a) Facilities' conditions assessment, including structural integrity, safety, and compliance with applicable standards and codes; (b) Utilization of academic space, evaluating whether current facilities meet the needs of students and educators effectively; and (c) Facilities modernization, identifying opportunities for upgrades and renovations to align with modern educational practices and technology. (4)  The study and assessment shall span a period of two (2) years and be completed before December 31, 2028.  Upon completion of the study and assessment, the department shall compile a comprehensive report of its findings and recommendations to be submitted to the Legislature and the Governor by January 1, 2029, for policy considerations. SECTION 3. The Legislature shall appropriate Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) of the portion of state lottery proceeds dedicated for deposit into the Education Enhancement Fund to the State Department of Education for the purpose of funding the study and assessment.  Of the funds appropriated, the department shall allocate Two Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00) for fiscal year 2027 for purposes of this act, and the second Two Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00) shall be allocated in fiscal year 2028. SECTION 4. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.